test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-aaldzha_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - āļdža: # Noun 27 'eng /est aevastus/fin' - full paradigm
     āļdža+N+Sg+Nom: āļdža
     āļdža+N+Sg+Gen: āļdža
     āļdža+N+Sg+Par: aļdžõ
     āļdža+N+Sg+Dat: āļdžan
     āļdža+N+Sg+Ins: āļdžaks
     āļdža+N+Sg+Ill: aļdžõ
     āļdža+N+Sg+Ela: āļdžast
     āļdža+N+Pl+Nom: āļdžad
     āļdža+N+Pl+Gen: āļdžad
     āļdža+N+Pl+Par: aļdžḑi
     āļdža+N+Pl+Dat: āļdžadõn
     āļdža+N+Pl+Ins: āļdžadõks
     āļdža+N+Pl+Ill: āļdžiz
     āļdža+N+Pl+Ela: āļdžist
